test/src/morphology/V-volljed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - võˊll’jed: # Verb 'to jump, momentanious' - full paradigm
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: võˊll’jam
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: võˊll’jak
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: võˊllai
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: võˊll’jep
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: võˊll’jeˊped
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: võˊll’je 
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prs+4: võˊll’jet 

     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: võˊll’jem
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: võˊll’jiǩ
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: võˊll’ji
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [võˊll’jim, võˊll’jin, võˊll’jiim, võˊll’jiin]
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [võˊll’jid, võˊll’jiid]
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: võˊll’je
     võˊll’jed+V+Ind+Prt+4: võˊll’ješ

     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+Sg1: võˊll’jeˊžem
     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+Sg2: võˊll’jeˊžiǩ
     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+Sg3: võˊll’jež
     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+Pl1: [võˊll’jeˊžep, võˊll’jeˊžim]
     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+Pl2: võˊll’jeˊžid 
     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+Pl3: võˊll’jeˊže
     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+4: võˊll’jeˊžet
     võˊll’jed+V+Pot+ConNeg: võˊll’jeˊže

     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+Sg1: võˊll’jeˊčem
     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+Sg2: võˊll’jeˊčiǩ
     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+Sg3: võˊll’jeˊči
     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+Pl1: [võˊll’jeˊčim, võˊll’jeˊčep]
     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+Pl2: võˊll’jeˊčid
     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+Pl3: võˊll’jeˊče
     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+4: võˊll’jeˊčeš
     võˊll’jed+V+Cond+ConNeg: võˊll’jeˊče

     võˊll’jed+V+Imp+Sg2: võˊlle
     võˊll’jed+V+Imp+Sg3: võˊll’jââǥǥas
     võˊll’jed+V+Imp+Pl1: võˊll’jâkap
     võˊll’jed+V+Imp+Pl2: võˊll’jeˊǩed
     võˊll’jed+V+Imp+Pl3: võˊll’jâkaz
     võˊll’jed+V+Imp+ConNeg+Sg2: võˊlle
     võˊll’jed+V+Imp+ConNeg: võˊll’juku

     võˊll’jed+V+Inf: võˊll’jed    
     võˊll’jed+V+ActEss: võˊll’jeˊmen
     võˊll’jed+V+Action: võˊll’jam
     võˊll’jed+V+PrsPrc: võˊll’jeei
     võˊll’jed+V+PrfPrc: [võˊll’jam, võˊll’jâmma]
     võˊll’jed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [võˊll’jummu, võˊll’jum]
     võˊll’jed+V+VAbess: [võˊll’jeǩâni, võˊll’jeǩeânai]
     võˊll’jed+V+GerTemp: võˊll’jeen
     võˊll’jed+V+GerInstr: võˊll’jeeˊl
